Utah statutes.
31A-23a-703.   Disclosure.
The producer, prior to the effective date of the policy, shall deliver written
notice to the prospective insured disclosing the relationship between the
producer and the controlled insurer.  However, if the business is placed
through a producer who is not a controlling producer, the controlling producer
shall retain in his records a signed commitment from the noncontrolling
producer that the noncontrolling producer is aware of the relationship between
the insurer and the producer and that the noncontrolling producer has, or
will, notify the insured.
